Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.730

Dyslexia rules.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement RCW 28A.300.700, * 28A.300.710, 28A.300.720, 28A.320.250, 28A.320.260, 28A.320.270, and ** 28A.165.035.

(2) The rules may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) A timeline for school districts and charter schools to implement the screenings required under RCW 28A.320.260;

(b) The frequency of conducting the screenings;

(c) Best practices for identifying screening tools and resources in accordance with RCW 28A.300.700;

(d) Training for school district staff conducting the screenings; and

(e) The members and scope of work for the dyslexia advisory council convened under *RCW 28A.300.710.

[ 2018 c 75 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28A.300.710 expired August 1, 2023.

**(2) RCW 28A.165.035 was repealed by 2021 c 111 s 13.